Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 44 O.S. 2021, Section 23, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 23. The Governor of the state shall be the Commander in


Chief of the Militia, and as such shall have supreme command of the


military forces of the state while in the service of the state or


until they are ordered and accepted into the service of the United


States. While in the service of the state, he or she shall have


power to muster out any organization of the state, discharge


enlisted men, as provided herein, and perform such other acts in


keeping with the laws of the Commander in Chief, subject to the laws


of the United States and regulations prescribed by the President of


the United States. No armed military force from another state or

Req. No. 3199 Page 1


territory shall be permitted to enter the state without his or her


permission, unless such military force be a part of the United


States, or is acting under the authority of the United States. No


independent military organization, except as a corps of cadets at


the educational institutions, shall be permitted to bear arms


without first securing permission of the Commander in Chief.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3199 CAD 1/14/2026 9:48:53 AM































Req. No. 3199 Page 2